output/hyph-id.level1.pat.txt
.ajo1
.bu1t
.ef1l
.ek1l
.elo1
.hu1t
.ja1h
.ki1h
.la1h
.ob1l
.ok1l
.op1l
.ru1t
.ti1h
.wu1t
a1a
aaf1
aat1
a1b
ab1l
1abn
1abs
abuh1
a1c
acet1
a1d
1adeg
1adeh
adi1h
1adil
1adm
1adop
1ads
1adud
adu1t
1adv
a1e
ae1k
a1f
1afd
af1l
a1g
agah1
1agre
agut1
a1haw
a1hir
a1hiy
a1ho
ah1og
ah1uy
a1iah
a1ib.
a1ibk
a1id
a1if
a1ih
a1ik.
a1il.
a1ilk
a1ilm
a1ilo
a1imb
a1in
a1ir
a1is
a1it
a1iw
a1iy
a1j
aj1l
1ajo
1ajus
ak1ag
ak1ef
ak1eg
1akib
aki1h
ak1l
a1l
1alie
1alih
1alko
an1an
an1ed
1aneh
an1ej
a1ngo
a1ngu
1ann
a1o
aok1
a1p
1apam
ap1an
ap1l
1apli
1aplu
apme1
1apri
ap1ud
apu1t
1aqs
arce1
aret1
arse1
a1s
as1an
1aspi
asuh1
asuk1
1asyi
a1t
at1an
a1uco
1audi
a1uh.
aui1
a1uk.
a1ukp
a1ul.
a1ulh
a1um.
aume1
1aumk
a1un
a1up.
a1ur
a1us.
a1ut
1auto
a1uw
a1uy
a1v
a1w
1awet
awig1
a1x
a1y
ayal1
1ayom
a1z
ba1ib
ba1ik
b1amp
ba1u
b1b
b1d
bek1l
ben1o
b1etn
b1f
b1g
bhu1
biak1
bib1a
bio1k
b1j
b1k
bku1
blak1
bles1
b1li
blos1
b1lu
b1m
b1n
bop1l
b1p
bruk1
b1s
b1t
bu1kh
b1v
b1w
b1y
byak1
b1z
ca1hi
ca1il
ca1im
ca1kw
ca1ul
ca1us
cek1l
celi1
cip1l
cis1
cok1l
cop1l
cut1
dai1h
da1il
dap1e
da1ud
d1b
d1d
d1f
d1g
d1j
d1k
d1l
d1m
d1n
dob1l
dos1o
do1u
d1p
druk1
d1s
d1t
du1kh
dut1
d1v
d1yu
e1a
ea1i
eaib1
ea1us
e1b
ebak1
eb1l
e1c
ecik1
e1d
e1e
e1f
e1g
ega1i
egog1
eguk1
e1h
eh1ol
ehu1
e1i
e1j
1ejaw
ejuk1
e1kh
ek1lu
1eksp
ek1uc
1ekui
e1l
1elue
ema1u
1emig
e1mle
emo1k
1enkr
e1o
eo1kl
e1p
ep1l
er1ir
er1iz
er1uf
er1ur
e1s
1esae
esek1
esi1h
1esok
e1t
etak1
etes1
etu1h
e1u
eu1k
eu1t
e1v
1evak
e1w
ewek1
e1y
e1z
fa1hi
fa1i
fait1
fa1ng
faz1a
f1b
f1d
f1f
f1g
f1h
f1k
flo1
f1lon
f1m
f1n
f1s
f1t
f1w
f1y
fya1
g1abd
g1abj
g1abl
g1ac
g1afk
gah1u
ga1il
g1akh
g1akr
g1aks
g1akt
g1aku
gap1e1
g1ars
g1arw
g1aso
g1asu
g1aud
ga1ul
g1a1um1
ga1us
g1aye
g1az
g1b
g1c
g1d
gdeg1
g1ef
g1ego
g1eje
ge1kl
g1eks
1geom
g1esk
g1ets
g1ev
g1eye
g1f
g1g
ggek1
ggok1
gguk1
g1h
ghu1t
g1iap
g1ibi
g1ibr
g1ici
g1id
g1iht
g1ij
g1ikh
g1ikl
g1ikr
g1ikt
g1iku
g1ilh
g1im
g1ind
g1inj
g1ins
g1int
1gioe
1giog
giok1
1giol
1giop
g1ire
g1isb
g1iso
g1isy
1givi
g1j
g1k
gkah1
gkeb1
gked1
gkek1
g1l
g1m
g1n
goak1
g1ob
gok1l
g1oks
g1oku
g1one
g1ord
g1ork
g1orn
go1u
g1p
g1q
1gred
grek1
g1s
gset1
gsut1
g1t
g1uap
g1uj
g1uki
g1ule
g1ulo
g1umb
g1umr
g1usi
g1w
g1y
1ha.
1haa
1hab
h1ac
1had
1haf
1hag
1hah
1hai
ha1ib
1haj
1hak
h1aks
1hal
1ham
h1an
1hana
1hang
1hank
1hant
1hanu
1hao
1hap
1har
1has
1hat
1ha1u
1hay
h1b
hber1
h1c
h1d
hde1
1he
h1eke
hela1
h1f
h1g
h1h
1hia
1hib
1hid
1hif
1hih
1hij
1hik
1hil
1him
1hin
1hip
1hit
h1j
hja1
h1k
h1l
hle1
h1m
h1n
h1ops
1hor
h1p
hpo1
h1r
h1s
h1t
1hu
h1w
hwa1
h1y
h1z
i1a
i1b
1ibai
ib1l
1ibub
i1c
ice1n
i1d
idik1
iduk1
id1y
i1e
i1f
if1an
if1l
i1g
ihak1
i1hi
i1ho
1ihr
ih1up
i1i
i1j
ijak1
1ijaz
ijik1
1ijt
i1k
ikh1i
1ikht
ikik1
ik1l
i1l
iles1
1ilmi
1imaj
imme1
1impl
1incr
1inf
i1ngi
i1ngo
i1ngu
1inh
1inko
1inp
1insp
1inst
1insy
1inv
i1o
1ionk
i1p
ip1ic
1ipri
ipuk1
i1q
i1r
ir1an
irce1
irep1
irip1
is1an
1isap
1isei
is1ui
1isuk
i1t
it1an
1itib
i1u
iul1
ium1
iup1
ius1
i1v
i1w
i1x
i1y
i1z
ja1i
jaib1
jana1
ja1uh
j1b
j1d
jek1
ji1h
jip1l
j1j
j1lo
j1m
j1n
j1t
ju1hi
juk1o
ju1ts
j1w
1ka
k1adu
k1ahl
ka1hy
ka1ib
ka1im
k1akr
k1aku
ka1ul
ka1um
k1b
kba1
k1c
k1d
1ke
ke1kl
ke1kr
k1enj
k1f
k1g
1khaw
1khay
1khi
1khod
1ki
kit1u
k1j
kjub1
k1k
1klad
klak1
k1lam
k1lar
k1le
k1lif
k1log
1klor
kluk1
k1m
k1n
kne1
1ko
ko1u
k1p
kpi1
1kreo
1krid
k1s
k1t
kta1h
1ku
k1ube
ku1kr
k1w
k1y
k1z
1la.
laci1
l1adh
1lah
la1ip
l1ajn
l1akh
lamo1
l1amr
l1an.
l1anf
1lap
la1ud
la1uj
la1ul
l1azm
l1b
l1c
l1d
l1f
l1g
lga1
l1h
l1ikh
l1ilm
1lip
l1isl
l1ism
l1isr
l1j
l1k
lk1l
l1l
lla1
l1m
l1n
lna1
loak1
1lof
loju1
1lom
1los
l1p
l1q
l1r
lra1
l1s
lse1n
l1t
l1v
l1w
l1y
l1z
1ma
mad1y
ma1hi
ma1ib
ma1im
m1an.
ma1ua
ma1um
ma1up
ma1uz
m1b
m1c
m1d
1me
m1f
m1g
m1h
1mi
mi1h
miu1
m1j
m1k
m1l
m1m
m1n
1mo
mo1ur
m1p
mpit1
mpok1
m1r
mri1n
1mrop
m1s
msak1
m1t
mti1
1mu
mu1t
m1v
m1w
mwu1
m1y
m1z
1na
n1aer
na1ib
na1ik
na1il
na1im
n1an.
na1ug
na1up
n1b
nber1
n1c
n1d
nd1av
1ne
n1f
1nga.
1ngaa
ng1ad
ng1ae
ng1ag
1ngah
1ngai
ng1am
ng1an
1ngao
1ngat
1ngau
1ngav
ng1aw
1nge
1ngia
1ngic
1ngif
ng1ig
1ngih
1ngip
1ngit
1ngiu
1ngiv
1ngiw
1ngiy
ng1iz
1ngo.
1ngoa
1ngoc
1ngod
1ngoe
1ngof
ng1og
1ngoh
ng1oj
1ngom
1ngon
1ngoo
ng1op
1ngos
1ngot
1ngov
1ngoy
ng1oz
1ngu.
ng1ub
1ngue
1nguf
ng1ug
1nguh
1ngut
1nguy
n1h
1ni
nir1a
ni1sf
n1iso
ni1sw
n1j
nja1h
njuk1
n1k
nkes1
n1l
nla1h
n1m
n1n
1no
no1kl
no1kw
non1e
n1p
n1r
n1s
nsaf1
ns1ak
ns1ov
nsu1t
n1t
1nu
nu1sw
n1v
n1w
1ny
n1z
o1a
o1b
obek1
1obj
ob1le
ob1lo
obos1
1obs
o1c
ocek1
oc1l
o1d
od1h
o1e
o1f
o1g
ogah1
1ogak
ogok1
o1h
1ohm
o1i
oik1a
o1j
ok1an
okek1
o1kh
1ok1lu
o1kr
1okup
o1l
olak1
o1m
o1ngo
1onsl
on1un
o1o
o1p
op1li
orf1a
1org
1orie
o1s
osip1
os1y
o1t
otak1
ot1an
o1um
o1un
o1v
over1
1ovu
o1w
owek1
o1x
o1y
oyak1
o1z
p1ade
paes1
pa1ib
pasi1
pa1ud
pau1h
pa1uk
pa1up
pa1us
p1b
p1c
pca1
pcu1
p1d
p1f
p1g
p1h
piu1t
p1j
p1k
p1lo.
p1m
p1n
polu1
p1p
pria1
p1s
p1t
p1w
p1y
p1z
1qa
q1d
1qi
q1l
q1r
q1s
qur1
q1w
1ra
r1abd
r1abj
r1aer
r1akh
ra1kl
r1akr
r1alp
r1alu
r1an.
r1arg
r1ars
r1art
r1asr
ra1up
ra1us
rayu1
r1aza
r1b
rba1h
r1c
r1d
1re
re1kl
r1etn
r1f
r1g
r1h
1ri
r1ijm
r1iju
r1ilm
r1isl
r1isy
r1j
rjum1
r1k
r1l
rla1h
r1m
r1n
rnu1t
1ro
ro1kl
rolo1
r1oms
r1ord
r1p
r1q
r1r
r1s
rsu1t
r1t
rta1h
rtib1
rtu1h
1ru
ruak1
r1ube
r1uca
r1uns
r1v
r1w
rx1
r1y
1ry.
r1z
1sa
sabo1
sa1il
sa1uh
sa1uk
sa1um
sa1up
sa1us
s1b
s1c
sce1
s1d
sde1
1se
s1f
sfi1
s1g
s1h
1shal
1si
s1ins
sip1l
sipo1
s1j
s1k
s1l
s1m
s1n
snob1
1so
so1kl
s1ops
s1osm
s1p
1spes
s1r
srek1
s1s
s1t
1stab
1su
sub1i
s1v
s1w
1sy
s1yan
syen1
1ta.
1taa
1tab
1tad
1tah
1tai1
ta1ib
ta1il
1taj
1tak
1tal
1tam
1tana
1tane
1tang
1tar
1tas
1tat
1tau
1taw
t1awu
t1b
t1c
tca1
t1d
tde1n
1te
tek1l
teok1
t1f
t1g
t1ha
tha1i
the1
1ti
t1inc
t1j
tje1
t1k
t1l
tlak1
t1m
t1n
1to
to1kl
t1p
tret1
t1s
tsa1n
t1t
1tu
t1uge
tu1kr
t1v
tva1
t1w
t1y
t1z
u1a
uang1
uap1
uar1u
ua1u
u1b
uba1i
ubek1
ub1en
ub1h
ub1l
ub1o
ubub1
ubuk1
u1c
1ucap
ucek1
u1d
1udek
ud1h
uduk1
u1e
uen1
u1f
uf1l
u1g
ugal1
uh1em
1uhj
u1ho
u1i
1uik1u
uir1
1uisu
u1j
ujud1
uk1aw
u1kha
1ukir
uk1l
u1l
ulek1
ul1ov
uluh1
ulul1
1umum
un1an
un1ay
unek1
ung1
ungi1
u1ngo
u1ngu
1unif
u1o
u1p
1upac
1upah
1upam
up1an
1upay
upet1
up1l
u1q
ur1an
uruk1
ur1ul
urup1
urus1
urut1
1usai
us1an
1usap
1usea
user1
u1sho
u1skr
usuk1
ut1an
ut1em
ut1h
utip1
utus1
u1u
uu1h
uu1n
u1v
u1w
uwa1n
u1y
uyub1
u1z
va1i
v1b
v1d
v1g
vi1h
v1la
v1li
v1n
v1r
v1s
v1t
1wa
wa1kr
wapa1
wa1u
wes1a
wet1a
wi1h
1win
win1i
w1r
w1t
wu1h
wur1a
wu1s
wuyu1
w1y
x1p
ya1uh
ya1uk1
ya1ul
ya1up
y1b
y1c
y1d
yeur1
y1f
y1g
y1h
y1j
y1k
y1l
yong1
yot1
y1r
y1s
y1t
yut1
1yuz
y1w
y1y
za1h
za1im
z1b
z1d
1ze
z1h
z1k
z1l
z1m
z1n
z1t
zu1h
z1y
z1z
ê1d
ê1n
ê1r
êra1
